Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.375

Legislative page scholarship program—Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, devises—Expenditures—Joint rules.

(1) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives may solicit and accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms. Any legislative member or legislative employee may solicit the same types of contributions for the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for establishing and operating the legislative page scholarship program authorized in RCW 44.04.370.

(3) Moneys received under this section must be deposited in the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account established in RCW 44.04.380.

(4) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives must adopt joint rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

[ 2017 c 322 s 2.]